Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2208
Acts by holder of general power.

For the purpose of granting consent or approval with regard to the acts or accounts of a personal representative, including relief from liability or penalty for failure to post bond or to perform other duties, the sole holder or all coholders of a presently exercisable general power of appointment, including one in the form of a power of amendment or revocation, are deemed to act for beneficiaries to the extent their interests (as objects, takers in default, or otherwise) are subject to the power.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 8, UPC § 1-108;

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 121.